Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-8402
Terms, defined.

For purposes of sections 71-8401 to 71-8407:

(1) Medical records means a provider's record of a patient's health history and treatment rendered;

(2) Mental health medical records means medical records or parts thereof created by or under the direction or supervision of a licensed psychiatrist, a licensed psychologist, a mental health practitioner licensed or certified pursuant to the Mental Health Practice Act, or a professional counselor who holds a privilege to practice in Nebraska as a professional counselor under the Licensed Professional Counselors Interstate Compact;

(3) Patient includes a patient or former patient;

(4) Patient request or request of a patient includes the request of a patient's guardian or other authorized representative; and

(5) Provider means a physician, psychologist, chiropractor, dentist, hospital, clinic, and any other licensed or certified health care practitioner or entity.

Laws 1999, LB 17, § 2;

Laws 2007, LB247, § 56;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 1306;

Laws 2022, LB752, § 29.

Licensed Professional Counselors Interstate Compact, see section 38-4201.

Mental Health Practice Act, see section 38-2101.